Hawaii, session 2026, HB2473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  This Act shall be known as the "Hawaiian Sense of Place Recognition Act". SECTION 2.  Chapter 226, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part    .  Hawaiian sense of place recognition §226-     Definitions. As used in this part: "Hawaiian sense of place" means the cultural, spiritual, environmental, and social relationships that Native Hawaiians and residents of Hawaii maintain with land, water, and natural and built environments.  This concept includes, but is not limited to the following elements: (1)  Connection to ʻaina.  Recognition of land as a living entity that sustains and nurtures the community, embodying ancestral knowledge, history, and genealogy; (2)  Cultural practices.  Integration and perpetuation of traditional practices, including hula, oli (chant), festivals, and other cultural expressions that reinforce relationships between people and place; (3)  Spiritual significance.  Acknowledgment of sacred sites, traditional cultural properties, and places of historical and mythological importance, contributing to individual and community identity; (4)  Community and family relationships.  Recognition of the role of ʻohana, community networks, and intergenerational ties in shaping and sustaining place-based identity; and (5)  Environmental stewardship.  Commitment to sustainability, biodiversity protection, and traditional Hawaiian environmental practices that promote long-term ecological balance. §226-     Promotion and education.  The office shall develop and implement educational and outreach programs to promote understanding and appreciation of the Hawaiian sense of place among residents, visitors, and public employees.  These programs shall include, but not be limited to: (1)  The cultural significance of ʻaina and place-based identity; (2)  Traditional Hawaiian environmental and land stewardship practices; and (3)  The historical, cultural, and spiritual narratives associated with specific places throughout the State. §226-     Land management, planning, and state construction.  (a)  In the planning, management, and development of land, state agencies shall incorporate the principles of the Hawaiian sense of place. (b)  All new construction, redevelopment, or major capital improvement projects on state-owned lands shall be designed and developed in alignment with the Hawaiian sense of place, including the consideration of: (1)  Architectural and landscape design that reflects Hawaiian values, cultural context, and environmental conditions; (2)  Integration of culturally and historically significant sites and features; (3)  Sustainable design practices consistent with traditional Hawaiian environmental stewardship; and (4)  Meaningful engagement with Native Hawaiian practitioners, cultural experts, and affected communities during planning and design phases. (c)  State agencies shall ensure that community input and cultural consultation are meaningfully incorporated to uphold traditions and practices reflective of the Hawaiian sense of place." SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________